Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-2163] Center for nursing special
fund. There is established a center for nursing special fund into which
shall be deposited any legislative appropriations, federal or private grants,
and any other funds collected for the purposes of the center for nursing
established under section [304A-1404]. The fund shall be administered by the
university, and moneys in the fund shall be expended to support the center's
activities. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next